Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 2. Validation

Cross references. —

As to public body refunding securities generally, see art. 1 of this chapter.

As to state refunding bonds, see §

9-4-901

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, under state constitution and laws, of issuance by state or state agency of revenue bonds to finance or refinance construction projects at private religious-affiliated colleges or universities, 95 ALR3d 1000.

§ 16-5-201.
Short title.

This act shall be known as the “1965 Public Securities Validation Act”.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 92, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.21; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1401; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-5-202(a)(iv).

§ 16-5-202.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Public body” of the state means any state educational institution or other state institution, its board of trustees or other governing body constituting a body corporate, any county, city or town, whether incorporated or governed under a general act, special charter, or otherwise, any school district, high school district, community college district, sanitary and improvement district, hospital district, power district, irrigation district, drainage district, water conservancy district, water district, sewer district, water and sewer district, cemetery district, fire protection district, any other corporate district, any corporate commission or any other political subdivision of the state constituting a body corporate;

“Public security” means a bond, note, certificate of indebtedness, coupon or other similar obligation for the payment of money, issued by this state or by any public body thereof;

“State” means the state of Wyoming and any board, commission, department, corporation, instrumentality or agency thereof;

“This act” means W.S.

16-5-201

through

16-5-204

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 92, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.22; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1402; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 16-5-203.
Outstanding securities.

All public securities of the state and of all public bodies outstanding on February 17, 1965, the right to the payment of which has not been barred by any pertinent statute of limitations, and all acts and proceedings taken, or purportedly taken by or on behalf of the state or any public body under law or under color of law preliminary to and in the authorization, execution, sale, issuance and payment (or any combination thereof) of all such public securities, are hereby validated, ratified, approved and confirmed, including but not necessarily limited to the terms, provisions, conditions and covenants of any resolution or ordinance appertaining thereto, the redemption of public securities before maturity and provisions therefor, the levy and collection of rates, tolls and charges, special assessments, and general and other taxes, and the acquisition and application of other revenues, the pledge and use of the proceeds thereof, and the establishment of liens thereon and funds therefor, appertaining to such public securities, except as hereinafter provided, notwithstanding any lack of power, authority, or otherwise, and notwithstanding any defects and irregularities in such public securities, acts and proceedings, and in such authorization, execution, sale, issuance and payment. Outstanding public securities are and shall be binding, legal, valid and enforceable obligations of the state or the public body issuing them in accordance with their terms and their authorizing proceedings.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 92, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.23; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1403; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-204.
Prior securities; limitations; exceptions.

This act validates any public securities heretofore issued and any acts and proceedings heretofore taken which the legislature could have supplied or provided for in the law under which the public securities were issued and the acts or proceedings were taken. This act is limited to the validation of public securities, acts and proceedings to the extent they can be effectuated under the state and federal constitutions. This act does not validate, ratify, approve, confirm or legalize any public security, act, proceeding or other matter the legality of which is being contested in any legal proceeding now pending and undetermined, and does not confirm, validate or legalize any public security, act, proceedings, or other matter which has heretofore been determined in any legal proceeding to be illegal, void or ineffective.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 92, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.24; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1404; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in all three sentences, see § 16-5-202(a)(iv).